Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 11. Arson and Burning

§ 501.
Arson causing death.

A person who willfully and maliciously burns the building of another, or willfully and maliciously sets fire to a building owned in whole or in part by himself or herself, by means of which the life of a person is lost, shall be guilty of murder in the first degree.

§ 502.
First degree arson.

A person who willfully and maliciously sets fire to or burns or causes to be burned, or who willfully and maliciously aids, counsels, or procures the burning of any dwelling house, whether occupied, unoccupied, or vacant, or any kitchen, shop, barn, stable, or other outhouse that is parcel thereof, or belonging, or adjoining thereto, whether the property of himself or herself or of another, shall be guilty of arson in the first degree, and shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years nor less than two years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 503.
Second degree arson.

A person who willfully and maliciously sets fire to or burns or causes to be burned, or who willfully and maliciously aids, counsels, or procures the burning of any building or structure of whatsoever class or character, whether the property of himself or herself or of another, not included or described in section 502 of this title, shall be guilty of arson in the second degree, and shall be imprisoned not more than five years nor less than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 504.
Third degree arson.

A person who willfully and maliciously sets fire to or burns or causes to be burned, or who willfully and maliciously aids, counsels, or procures the burning of any personal property of whatsoever class or character, not less than $25.00 in value and the property of another person, shall be guilty of arson in the third degree, and shall be imprisoned not more than three years nor less than one year, or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 505.
Fourth degree arson.

A person who willfully and maliciously attempts to set fire to or willfully and maliciously attempts to burn or to aid, counsel, or procure the burning of any of the buildings or property mentioned in sections 502-504 of this title, or who willfully and maliciously commits any act preliminary thereto, or in furtherance thereof, shall be guilty of arson in the fourth degree, and shall be imprisoned not more than two years nor less than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 506.
Burning to defraud insurer.

A person who willfully and with intent to injure or defraud the insurer sets fire to or burns or attempts so to do or who willfully and maliciously causes to be burned or who willfully and maliciously aids, counsels, or procures the burning of any building, structure, or personal property, of whatsoever class or character, whether the property of himself or herself or of another, which shall at the time be insured by any person, company, or corporation against loss or damage by fire, shall be imprisoned not more than five years nor less than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 507.
Burning forests.

A person who willfully and maliciously sets on fire, or causes to be set on fire, woods or forest, so as to occasion injury to another person, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 508.
Setting fires.

A person who enters upon lands of another and sets a fire that causes damage shall be imprisoned not more than 60 days nor less than 30 days or fined not more than $100.00 nor less than $10.00, or both.
The provisions of this section shall not affect the provisions of section 507 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23; 2019, No. 77, § 9.

§ 509.
Attempts.

The placing or distributing of any inflammable, explosive, or combustible material or substance, or any device, in any building or property mentioned in sections 502-505 of this title in any arrangement or preparation with intent willfully and maliciously to set fire to or burn the same, or to procure the setting fire to or burning of the same shall, for the purposes of this chapter, constitute an attempt to burn such building or property.